en: Semiconductor material: Gallium antimonide (GaSb); Gallium arsenide (GaAs); Gallium nitride (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indium gallium arsenide (InGaAs); Indium phosphide (InP); Silicon (Si); Silicon carbide (SiC); Silicon-germanium (SiGe); Other
bg-BG: Полупроводников материал: Галиев антимонид (GaSb); Галиев арсенид (GaAs); Галиев нитрид (GaN); Германий (Ge); Индиев галиев арсенид (InGaAs); Индиев фосфид (InP); Силиций (Si); Силициев карбид (SiC); Силиций-германий (SiGe); Други
lt-LT: Puslaidininkio medžiaga: Galio stibidas (GaSb); Galio arsenidas (GaAs); Galio nitridas (GaN); Germanis (Ge); Indžio galio arsenidas (InGaAs); Indžio fosfidas (InP); Silicis (Si); Silicio karbidas (SiC); Silicio-germanio (SiGe); Kita
fi: Puolijohdemateriaali: Galliumantimonidi (GaSb); Galliumarsenidi (GaAs); Galliumnitridi (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indiumgalliumarsenidi (InGaAs); Indiumfosfidi (InP); Pii (Si); Piikarbidi (SiC); Piigermanium (SiGe); Muu
th: วัสดุเซมิคอนดักเตอร์: แกลเลียมแอนติโมไนด์ (GaSb); แกลเลียมอาร์เซไนด์ (GaAs); แกลเลียมไนไตรด์ (GaN); เจอร์เมเนียม (Ge); อินเดียมแกลเลียมอาร์เซไนด์ (InGaAs); อินเดียมฟอสไฟด์ (InP); ซิลิกอน (Si); ซิลิกอนคาร์ไบด์ (SiC); ซิลิกอน-เจอร์เมเนียม (SiGe); อื่นๆ
nl: Halfgeleider materiaal: Galliumantimonide (GaSb); Galliumarsenide (GaAs); Galliumnitride (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indiumgalliumarsenide (InGaAs); Indiumfosfide (InP); Silicium (Si); Siliciumcarbide (SiC); Silicium-germanium (SiGe); Andere
ru: Материал полупроводника: Антимонид галлия (GaSb); Арсенид галлия (GaAs); Нитрид галлия (GaN); Германий (Ge); Арсенид индия-галлия (InGaAs); Фосфид индия (InP); Кремний (Si); Карбид кремния (SiC); Кремний-германий (SiGe); Другой
de: Halbleitermaterial: Galliumantimonid (GaSb); Galliumarsenid (GaAs); Galliumnitrid (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indium-Gallium-Arsenid (InGaAs); Indiumphosphid (InP); Silizium (Si); Siliziumkarbid (SiC); Silizium-Germanium (SiGe); Sonstiges
ja: 半導体材料: ガリウムアンチモン（GaSb）; ガリウムヒ素（GaAs）; 窒化ガリウム（GaN）; ゲルマニウム（Ge）; インジウムガリウムヒ素（InGaAs）; リン化インジウム（InP）; シリコン（Si）; 炭化ケイ素（SiC）; シリコンゲルマニウム（SiGe）; その他
el: Υλικό ημιαγωγού: Αντιμονίδιο γαλλίου (GaSb); Αρσενίδιο γαλλίου (GaAs); Νιτρίδιο γαλλίου (GaN); Γερμάνιο (Ge); Αρσενίδιο ινδίου γαλλίου (InGaAs); Φωσφίδιο ινδίου (InP); Πυρίτιο (Si); Καρβίδιο πυριτίου (SiC); Πυρίτιο-γερμάνιο (SiGe); Άλλο
fr: Matériau semi-conducteur: Antimoniure de gallium (GaSb); Arséniure de gallium (GaAs); Nitrure de gallium (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Arséniure d'indium-gallium (InGaAs); Phosphure d'indium (InP); Silicium (Si); Carbure de silicium (SiC); Silicium-germanium (SiGe); Autre
es: Material semiconductor: Antimoniuro de galio (GaSb); Arseniuro de galio (GaAs); Nitruro de galio (GaN); Germanio (Ge); Arseniuro de galio e indio (InGaAs); Fosfuro de indio (InP); Silicio (Si); Carburo de silicio (SiC); Silicio-germanio (SiGe); Otros
cs: Polovodičový materiál: Antimonid gallitý (GaSb); Arsenid gallitý (GaAs); Nitrid gallitý (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Arsenid india-gallia (InGaAs); Fosfid india (InP); Křemík (Si); Karbid křemíku (SiC); Křemík-germanium (SiGe); Jiné
pt-BR: Material semicondutor: Antimoneto de gálio (GaSb); Arseneto de gálio (GaAs); Nitreto de gálio (GaN); Germânio (Ge); Arseneto de índio e gálio (InGaAs); Fosfeto de índio (InP); Silício (Si); Carbeto de silício (SiC); Silício-germânio (SiGe); Outro
it: Materiale semiconduttore: Antimoniuro di gallio (GaSb); Arseniuro di gallio (GaAs); Nitruro di gallio (GaN); Germanio (Ge); Arseniuro di gallio e indio (InGaAs); Fosfuro di indio (InP); Silicio (Si); Carburo di silicio (SiC); Silicio-germanio (SiGe); Altro
sv: Halvledarmaterial: Galliumantimonid (GaSb); Galliumarsenid (GaAs); Galliumnitrid (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indium-galliumarsenid (InGaAs); Indiumfosfid (InP); Kisel (Si); Kiselkarbid (SiC); Kisel-germanium (SiGe); Övrigt
sl-SI: Polprevodniški material: Galijev antimonid (GaSb); Galijev arzenid (GaAs); Galijev nitrid (GaN); Germanij (Ge); Indijev galijev arzenid (InGaAs); Indijev fosfid (InP); Silicij (Si); Silicijev karbid (SiC); Silicij-germanij (SiGe); Drugo
pt-PT: Material semicondutor: Antimoneto de gálio (GaSb); Arseneto de gálio (GaAs); Nitreto de gálio (GaN); Germânio (Ge); Arseneto de índio e gálio (InGaAs); Fosfeto de índio (InP); Silício (Si); Carboneto de silício (SiC); Silício-germânio (SiGe); Outro
pl: Materiał półprzewodnikowy: Antymonek galu (GaSb); Arsenek galu (GaAs); Azotek galu (GaN); German (Ge); Arsenek indu-galu (InGaAs); Fosforek indu (InP); Krzem (Si); Węglik krzemu (SiC); Krzem-german (SiGe); Inne
zh-TW: 半導體材料: 銻化鎵 (GaSb); 砷化鎵 (GaAs); 氮化鎵 (GaN); 鍺 (Ge); 銦鎵砷 (InGaAs); 磷化銦 (InP); 矽 (Si); 碳化矽 (SiC); 矽鍺 (SiGe); 其他
ko: 반도체 재료: 갈륨 안티몬화물 (GaSb); 갈륨 비화물 (GaAs); 갈륨 질화물 (GaN); 게르마늄 (Ge); 인듐 갈륨 비화물 (InGaAs); 인듐 인화물 (InP); 실리콘 (Si); 실리콘 카바이드 (SiC); 실리콘-게르마늄 (SiGe); 기타
hu: Félvezető anyag: Gallium-antimonid (GaSb); Gallium-arzenid (GaAs); Gallium-nitrid (GaN); Germánium (Ge); Indium-gallium-arzenid (InGaAs); Indium-foszfid (InP); Szilícium (Si); Szilícium-karbid (SiC); Szilícium-germánium (SiGe); Egyéb
zh-CN: 半导体材料: 锑化镓 (GaSb); 砷化镓 (GaAs); 氮化镓 (GaN); 锗 (Ge); 砷化铟镓 (InGaAs); 磷化铟 (InP); 硅 (Si); 碳化硅 (SiC); 硅锗 (SiGe); 其他
ro-RO: Material semiconductor: Antimonură de galiu (GaSb); Arseniură de galiu (GaAs); Nitrură de galiu (GaN); Germaniu (Ge); Arseniură de galiu și indiu (InGaAs); Fosfură de indiu (InP); Siliciu (Si); Carbură de siliciu (SiC); Siliciu-germaniu (SiGe); Altele
vi: Vật liệu bán dẫn: Gali antimonide (GaSb); Gali arsenide (GaAs); Gali nitride (GaN); Gecmani (Ge); Indi gali arsenide (InGaAs); Indi phosphide (InP); Silic (Si); Silic carbide (SiC); Silic-gecmani (SiGe); Khác
da: Halvledermateriale: Galliumantimonid (GaSb); Galliumarsenid (GaAs); Galliumnitrid (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indiumgalliumarsenid (InGaAs); Indiumfosfid (InP); Silicium (Si); Siliciumcarbid (SiC); Silicium-germanium (SiGe); Andet
nb: Halvleder materiale: Galliumantimonid (GaSb); Galliumarsenid (GaAs); Galliumnitrid (GaN); Germanium (Ge); Indiumgalliumarsenid (InGaAs); Indiumfosfid (InP); Silisium (Si); Silisiumkarbid (SiC); Silisium-germanium (SiGe); Annet
sk-SK: Materiál polovodičov: Antimonid gália (GaSb); Arzenid gália (GaAs); Nitrid gália (GaN); Germánium (Ge); Arzenid india a gália (InGaAs); Fosfid india (InP); Kremík (Si); Karbid kremíka (SiC); Kremík-germánium (SiGe); Iné
tr: Yarı iletken malzeme: Galyum antimonit (GaSb); Galyum arsenit (GaAs); Galyum nitrit (GaN); Germanyum (Ge); İndiyum galyum arsenit (InGaAs); İndiyum fosfat (InP); Silikon (Si); Silikon karbür (SiC); Silikon-germanyum (SiGe); Diğer
hr-HR: Poluvodički materijal: Galijev antimonid (GaSb); Galijev arsenid (GaAs); Galijev nitrid (GaN); Germanij (Ge); Indij galijev arsenid (InGaAs); Indijev fosfid (InP); Silicij (Si); Silicijev karbid (SiC); Silicij-germanij (SiGe); Ostalo